Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 57 Racketeer Violence

11-57-1.
Violent crime in aid of racketeering.

Every person who either: (1) as consideration for anything of pecuniary value from a person or persons engaged in racketeering activity as defined in chapter 15 of title 7; or (2) as the means of gaining entrance to or maintaining or increasing his financial position in an enterprise in violation of chapter 15 of title 7; commits murder, kidnapping, mayhem, assault with a dangerous weapon, or assault resulting in serious bodily injury, or threatens a person with the commission of such an offense against him or her, or attempts or conspires to commit that offense, shall be guilty of a felony and shall be sentenced, in addition to the sentence for the offense, to a term of imprisonment of not less than two (2) years and not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand ($10,000) dollars, or both. A term of imprisonment imposed pursuant to this section shall be served consecutively to any other sentence of imprisonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 449, § 1.

11-57-2.
Solicitation to commit a violent crime in aid of racketeering.

Every person who solicits another to commit a violation of §

11-57-1

shall be guilty of a felony and shall be sentenced, in addition to any other sentence imposed, to a term of imprisonment of not less than two (2) years and not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand ($10,000) dollars, or both. A term of imprisonment imposed pursuant to this section shall be served consecutively to any other sentence of imprisonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 449, § 1.